New York, session 2025-2026, A10077.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Title 102 of article 13 of the public housing law, as added 2 by chapter 533 of the laws of 1968, is REPEALED. 3 § 2. Section 520 of the public housing law, as added by chapter 42 of 4 the laws of 1969, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 520. Village of Canton housing authority. 1. A municipal housing 6 authority to be known as the village of Canton housing authority is 7 hereby created and established for the village of Canton in the county 8 of St. Lawrence for the accomplishment of any or all of the purposes 9 specified in article eighteen of the constitution of the state of New 10 York. It shall constitute a body corporate and politic, be perpetual in 11 duration and consist of five members. It shall have the powers and 12 duties now or hereafter conferred by this chapter upon municipal housing 13 authorities. It shall be organized in the manner prescribed by and 14 subject to the provisions of this chapter, and the authority, its 15 members, officers and employees and its operations and activities shall 16 in all respects be governed by the provisions of this chapter. 17 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule or regulation to 18 the contrary, the village of Potsdam housing authority, in its entirety, 19 shall be transferred to the village of Canton housing authority. All 20 powers and duties of the village of Potsdam housing authority pursuant 21 to section thirty-seven of this chapter or any other provision relating 22 to municipal housing authorities under article three of this chapter 23 shall be transferred to and assumed by the village of Canton housing 24 authority. 25 § 3. Transfer of functions. All of the functions and powers possessed 26 by, and all of the obligations and duties of the village of Potsdam 27 housing authority are transferred and assigned to, assumed by and 28 devolved upon the village of Canton housing authority, in accordance 29 with and pursuant to the provisions of this act. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14511-01-6 A. 10077 2 1 § 4. Transfer of employees. Notwithstanding any other provision of 2 law, rule or regulation to the contrary, upon the transfer of functions 3 from the village of Potsdam housing authority pursuant to this act, all 4 employees of the village of Potsdam housing authority shall be trans- 5 ferred to the village of Canton housing authority. Employees transferred 6 pursuant to this section shall be transferred without further examina- 7 tion or qualification and shall retain their respective civil service 8 classifications, status and collective bargaining unit designations and 9 collective bargaining agreements. 10 § 5. Transfer of records. All books, papers, and property of the 11 village of Potsdam housing authority shall be provided to and deemed to 12 be in the possession of the village of Canton housing authority. 13 § 6. Continuity of authority. For the purpose of succession of all 14 functions, powers, duties and obligations transferred and assigned to, 15 devolved upon and assumed by it pursuant to this act, the village of 16 Canton housing authority shall be deemed and held to constitute the 17 continuation of the village of Potsdam housing authority. 18 § 7. Completion of unfinished business. Any business or other matter 19 undertaken or commenced by the village of Potsdam housing authority 20 pertaining to or connected with the functions, powers, obligations and 21 duties hereby transferred and assigned to the village of Canton housing 22 authority and pending on the effective date of this act, may be 23 conducted and completed by the village of Canton housing authority in 24 the same manner and under the same terms and conditions and with the 25 same effect as if conducted and completed by the village of Potsdam 26 housing authority. 27 § 8. Continuation of rules and regulations. All rules, regulations, 28 acts, orders, determinations, and decisions of the village of Potsdam 29 housing authority pertaining to the functions and powers transferred and 30 assigned pursuant to this act, in force at the time of such transfer and 31 assumption, shall continue in full force and effect as rules, regu- 32 lations, acts, orders, determinations and decisions of the village of 33 Canton housing authority until duly modified or abrogated by the board 34 of such authority. 35 § 9. Terms occurring in laws, contracts and other documents. Whenever 36 the village of Potsdam housing authority, or the board thereof, is 37 referred to or designated in any contract or document pertaining to the 38 functions, powers, obligations and duties hereby transferred to and 39 assigned to the village of Canton housing authority, such reference or 40 designation shall be deemed to refer to the village of Canton housing 41 authority or such authority's board, as applicable. 42 § 10. Existing rights and remedies preserved. No existing right or 43 remedy of any character shall be lost, impaired or affected by any 44 provisions of this act. 45 § 11. Pending actions and proceedings. No action or proceeding pending 46 at the time when this act shall take effect, brought by or against the 47 village of Potsdam housing authority, or the board thereof, shall be 48 affected by any provisions of this act, but the same may be prosecuted 49 or defended in the name of the village of Canton housing authority, or 50 the board thereof. In all such actions and proceedings, the village of 51 Canton housing authority, upon application of the court, shall be 52 substituted as a party. 53 § 12. Transfer of assets and liabilities. All assets and liabilities 54 of the village of Potsdam housing authority are hereby transferred to 55 and assumed by the village of Canton housing authority. 56 § 13. This act shall take effect immediately.